Illinois, session 104th, HB3813.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 9-1 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/9-1)  (from Ch. 46, par. 9-1)7    Sec. 9-1. As used in this Article, unless the the context 8otherwise requires, the terms defined in Sections 9-1.1 9through 9-1.13, have the respective meanings as defined in 10those Sections.11(Source: P.A. 86-873.)